Utah statutes.
32A-12-302 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Storing or possessing pursuant to federal stamp.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person, not acting for or licensed by the commission, who holds a stamp issued by the Bureau of Internal Revenue of the United States as a retail dealer in fermented malt liquor, or the person's operators or employees, to have, hold, store, or possess liquor in or on premises described in the stamp while the stamp remains in effect, except as otherwise provided by statute.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent persons other than the owner or operator, or employees of either, from possessing and consuming, but not storing, liquor on premises described by the fermented malt liquor stamp.

